North Carolina, session 2025, HB197.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to local
health departments, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, to do all of the following:
(1) To better prepare the State for emerging and re-emerging public health threats.
(2) To retain staff, hire additional disease staff, including public health nurses and
other public health professionals, and to expand public health programs and
services, which are vital not only to maintaining North Carolina's
communicable disease response but also to ensuring that the essential public
health services described in G.S. 130A-1.1 are available and accessible to the
population served by each local health department.
SECTION 1.(b) In the distribution of these funds to local health departments, for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Public Health, shall do all of the following:
(1) Divide twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) equally
among the local health departments based on the number of counties served
by each local health department.
*H197-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Distribute the remaining twelve million five hundred thousand dollars
($12,500,000) to local health departments based upon the percentage of the
State population served by each of the local health departments.
(3) Begin distributing the funds allocated under this section no later than (i) 60
days after the date the Office of State Budget and Management and the Office
of the State Controller establish the certified budget for the Department of
Health and Human Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and (ii) 60 days after
the date the Office of State Budget and Management and the Office of the
State Controller establish the certified budget for the Department of Health
and Human Services for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 197-First Edition